South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3909.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 7, Chapter 11, Title 8 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 8-11-615.  Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an eligible employee who has unused annual leave in excess of forty-five days at the end of the calendar year must be paid for the excess days at one hundred percent of the eligible employee's base pay. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----